src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON JELLE
!! ## LEXICON `@LEXNAME@`
!! The `@LEXNAME@` lexicon is used for loanadjectives on `jelle` and `–jelle` with an
!! used with the stem *jelle* This one should be 'jeelle'? SGM?

!! ```
 +Err/Orth:^ell e_ES_LOAN ; !!= @CODE@
         :jell e_ES_LOAN ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```

LEXICON UELLE
!! ## LEXICON `@LEXNAME@`
!! ```
         :^ell e_ES_LOAN ; !!= @CODE@
 +Err/Orth:vell e_ES_LOAN ; !!= @CODE@
!! ```

LEXICON e_ES_LOAN  !LOAN  - fjerna comp LA - vi kan vurdere om noen av disse bør ha komp.
           :e ATTR_0 ;
           :es PRED_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:e PRED_0           ; ! 
 
LEXICON ÆRE  !LOAN
         :ær e_E_EVEN ;
 +Err/Orth:r  e_E_EVEN ;

LEXICON ENTE  !LOAN
         :ent  e_E_EVENNOCOMP1 ; ! eller skal det være -e-es ?
 +Err/Orth:eent e_E_EVENNOCOMP1 ;

LEXICON LES ! Should contain only loanwords (?)
            :%>%^DISIMPes       ATTR_0   ;
   +Sg+Nom:%>%^DISIMPe        FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Acc:asse%>m            FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Gen:asse%>n            FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ill:asse%>se           FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ine:asse%>sne          FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ela:asse%>ste          FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Com:ass%>ine           FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMP%>ass%>h FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Acc:%>ass%>ide         FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMP%>ass%>  IGENSUFF ;
   +Pl+Ill:%>ass%>ide         FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Ine:%>ass%>ine         FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Ela:%>ass%>ijste       FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Com:%>ass%>igujmie     FINAL1   ;
          :ass                EVEN_ESS ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>%^DISIMPes       R        ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:asse%>n            R        ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:ass%>i             R        ;

LEXICON IHKE_IHKELES_LOAN
   :e  ATTR_0 ;
   :es PRED_0 ;
   +Err/Lex:%>%^DISIMPeles              ATTR_0   ;
   +Sg+Nom+Err/Lex:%>%^DISIMPele        FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Acc+Err/Lex:lasse%>m             FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Gen+Err/Lex:lasse%>n             FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ill+Err/Lex:lasse%>se            FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ine+Err/Lex:lasse%>sne           FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ela+Err/Lex:lasse%>ste           FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Com+Err/Lex:lass%>line           FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Nom+Err/Lex:%>%^DISIMP%>lass%>h  FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Acc+Err/Lex:%>ass%>lide          FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Gen+Err/Lex:%>%^DISIMP%>lass%>   IGENSUFF ;
   +Pl+Ill+Err/Lex:%>lass%>ide          FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Ine+Err/Lex:%>lass%>ine          FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Ela+Err/Lex:%>lass%>ijste        FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Com+Err/Lex:%>lass%>igujmie      FINAL1   ;
         +Err/Lex :lass                 EVEN_ESS ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Lex:%>%^DISIMPles       R        ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Lex:asse%>elen          R        ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Lex:ass%>eli            R        ;


LEXICON AABELE
         :aabel Ce_CES_ODD ; ! akseptaabele
 +Err/Orth:abel  Ce_CES_ODD ; ! akseptabele


LEXICON IJBELE
         :ijbel Ce_CES_ODD ; ! fleksijbele
 +Err/Orth:ibel  Ce_CES_ODD ; ! fleksibele

LEXICON AATE_adj_LOAN
         :ate PRED_0 ;
         :ate ATTR_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:te  ATTR_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:hte ATTR_0 ;


! ******   LOAN END ********

!4-stavelses
LEXICON LES_LASSE_ie_Comp
 :al ODDCOMP      ;
     LES_LASSE_ie ;

LEXICON LES_LASSE_ie
   LES_LASSE_NOM_ie ;
   LES_LASSE_OBL_ie ;

LEXICON LES_LASSE_NOM_ie
            :eles     ATTR_0   ; ! should redirect to case paradigm
   +Sg+Nom:eles     FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Nom:elass%>h FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Gen:elass%>  IGENSUFF ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:eles     R        ;


LEXICON LES_LASSE_OBL_ie
   +Sg+Nom:alasse           FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Acc:alasse%>m        FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Gen:alasse%>n        FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ill:alasse%>se       FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ine:alasse%>sne      FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Ela:alasse%>ste      FINAL1   ;
   +Sg+Com:alass%>ine       FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Acc:al%>ass%>ide     FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Ill:al%>ass%>ide     FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Ine:al%>ass%>ine     FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Ela:al%>ass%>ijste   FINAL1   ;
   +Pl+Com:al%>ass%>igujmie FINAL1   ;
          :alass            EVEN_ESS ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:alasse%>n        R        ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:alass%>i         R        ;

LEXICON Ce_CES_ODD
            :e         ATTR_0     ;
            :e         PRED_S     ;
     +Use/NG:e         PRED_0     ; ! jfr. leksikonnamnet, TT
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ; ! dïhte komfortaabelegåetie ??
!                      ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON jes_js_JES_JS_ODD !to adj: bualijes, fååmijes
     +Use/NG:%^DISIMP  ATTR_S  ;
            :%^DISIMPe ATTR_S  ;
     +Use/NG:%^DISIMP  PRED_S  ;
            :%^DISIMPe PRED_S  ;
!                      ije_ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R       ;
                       ODDCOMP ;


LEXICON ijes_ijs_IJE_ODD ! GUALIJES
   ijes_ijs_IJE_ODDNOCOMP ; ! attr -es, -s, pred -e
   ODDCOMP                ;

LEXICON ijes_ijs_IJE_ODDNOCOMP ! DÅAJMIJES
            :e         ATTR_S      ; ! LMM: dåajmijes
     +Use/NG:          ATTR_S      ; ! LMM: dåajmijs, KB: gualijs
                       ije_ODDCASE ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R           ;

! type 3

LEXICON Cs_CE_ODD !          OK!
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
            :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ; ! CASE-OK!
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;
                       ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON oeCs_OECE_ODD
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
            :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;
                       ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON Cs_CE_ODDNOCOMP
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
            :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ; !LA
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ; !LA



LEXICON Ces_CE_ODDNOCOMP
            :%^DISIMPe ATTR_S ;
            :%^DISIMPe PRED_0 ;
!                      ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R      ;


!LEXICON Ces_Ce_CES_CE_ODD   !as Ces_CES_CE_ODD, but with ATTR_0
!                   Ces_Ce_CES_CE_ODDNOCOMP ;
!                   ODDCOMP                 ;
! +Err/Orth:%^DISIMP ODDCOMP                 ;

LEXICON Ces_Ce_CES_CE_ODDNOCOMP
 +Use/NG:%^DISIMPe ATTR_0 ;
        :%^DISIMPe ATTR_S ;
 +Use/NG:%^DISIMPe PRED_S ;
!                  ODDCASE ;

!LEXICON Ce_Ces_CES_CE_ODD
!                   Ce_Ces_CES_CE_ODDNOCOMP ;
!                   ODDCOMP                 ;
! +Err/Orth:%^DISIMP ODDCOMP                 ;

!LEXICON Ce_Ces_CES_CE_ODDNOCOMP
!        :%^DISIMPe ATTR_0 ;
! +Use/NG:%^DISIMPe ATTR_S ;
!        :%^DISIMPe PRED_S ;
!                  ODDCASEOBL ;


LEXICON Ces_CES_CE_ODD
            :%^DISIMPe ATTR_S  ; !<=====  gir Attr -s
!     +Use/NG:%^DISIMPe PRED_S  ; ! -s ikke -s i Pred i denne gruppen.
                       ODDCASE ; ! tt kommentert inn
                       ODDCOMP ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R       ;
    +Err/Orth:%^DISIMP  ODDCOMP ;
!   ass NIEJTE ;! <-- EVEN CASE!


! LEXICON Ces_CE_ODD
!    Ces_CE_ODDNOCOMP ;
!    ODDCOMP          ;
! 

LEXICON Ces_CES_CE_ODDNOCOMP
            :%^DISIMPe ATTR_S     ;
     +Use/NG:%^DISIMPe PRED_S     ;
            :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;



LEXICON hks_hke_HKS_HKE_ODD
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S     ;
     +Use/NG:%^DISIMPe ATTRCONT   ;

            :%^DISIMP  PRED_S     ;
                       ODDCASEOBL ;
!           :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R          ;
                       ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON oehks_oehke_OEHKS_OEHKE_ODD
            :%^DISIMP  ATTR_S       ;
+Use/NG:%^DISIMPe ATTRCONT   ;
            :%^DISIMP  PRED_S       ;
                       ODDCASEOBL   ;
!           :%^DISIMPe PRED_0       ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%^DISIMPe R           ;
                       ODD_ÅBPOE    ;


LEXICON HKE_ODD_NGCOMP
 +Err/Orth:%^DISIMPe ATTRCONT   ;
         :%^DISIMPe PRED_0     ;
                    ODDCASEOBL ;
  +Use/NG:          ODDCOMP    ;

LEXICON HKE_ODD_COMP
 +Err/Orth:%^DISIMPe ATTRCONT   ;
         :%^DISIMPe PRED_0             ;
                    ODDCASEOBL         ;
                    ODDCOMP            ;


! Odd syllabic stems - adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
